Alabama, session 2026rs, SB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Chapter 2B is added to Title 29, Code of
15 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
16 Chapter 2B. Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
17 Services.
18 §29-2B-1
19 There is created the Alabama Commission on the
20 Evaluation of Services, which shall be a legislative
21 department, for the purpose of advising the Legislature
22 regarding the evaluation of services funded by the state.
23 §29-2B-2
24 (a) The affairs of the commission shall be administered
25 by the director, whose actions shall be supervised and
26 controlled by the Legislative Committee on the Evaluation of
27 Services. The director shall be selected and appointed by the
28 committee and shall receive compensation and benefits in an
Page 1

committee and shall receive compensation and benefits in an
SB317 Enrolled
29 amount established by the committee, payable in the same
30 manner as is provided for other state employees.
31 (b) A vacancy in the office of director arising from
32 any cause shall be filled by the committee. The committee may
33 appoint a highly qualified person as its director to a
34 nonmerit, conditional appointment. The director, with the
35 consent and approval of the committee, shall select and
36 supervise professional and clerical staff upon a full-time or
37 part-time basis as necessary to assist the committee and the
38 director in performing the duties assigned by this chapter.
39 The director, without regard to the state Merit System Act,
40 may hire employees as necessary to effectuate the purposes of
41 this chapter. The number of employees, their compensation, and
42 other expenditures of the committee shall be within the limits
43 and in compliance with the appropriation made therefor by the
44 Legislature and within budgets that shall be approved from
45 time to time by the commission.
46 §29-2B-3
47 (a) There is hereby established the Alabama Commission
48 on the Evaluation of Services Fund in the State Treasury for
49 the deposit of all funds received by the commission and which
50 shall be used for the operations of the commission.
51 (b) The commission may receive state appropriations and
52 apply for and receive grant funds from other sources
53 including, but not limited to, foundations, governmental
54 entities, federal grants, and businesses. No public monies
55 shall be expended by the director for any purpose unless the
56 monies have been appropriated by the Legislature to the
Page 2

monies have been appropriated by the Legislature to the
SB317 Enrolled
57 commission. Any monies appropriated shall be budgeted and
58 allotted pursuant to the Budget Management Act in accordance
59 with Article 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41, and only in the
60 amounts provided by the Legislature in the general
61 appropriations act or other appropriation acts.
62 §29-2B-4
63 (a) The commission shall conduct evaluations of any
64 agency or programs, services, activities, or functions of any
65 agency at the direction of the Legislative Committee on the
66 Evaluation of Services. Evaluations may include oversight and
67 performance audits or evaluations pursuant to 45 CFR Part 164
68 E or 39 CFR Part 99 Subpart D.
69 (b) Any agency, or third party contractor to an agency,
70 shall furnish to the commission any available material, which
71 the commission determines to be necessary in the performance
72 of the duties and functions of the commission.
73 (c) Any collection of data by an agency, or third party
74 contractor to an agency, shall be furnished to the commission
75 upon request by the director or an employee of the commission.
76 (d) The commission may take application for and award
77 grant funds to any agency to further the purposes, policies,
78 recommendations, and objectives of the commission subject to
79 the availability of funding.
80 §29-2B-5
81 For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have
82 the following meanings:
83 (1) AGENCY. Any department, board, commission, office,
84 institution, or other unit of state government that receives
Page 3

institution, or other unit of state government that receives
SB317 Enrolled
85 appropriations from the state.
86 (2) CAUSAL IMPACT EVALUATION. A rigorous evaluation
87 that uses experimental or quasi-experimental methods to
88 determine whether a program caused observed outcomes,
89 isolating the program's effects from other factors.
90 (3) EVALUATION PLAN. A written document that describes
91 how an agency will assess a program's implementation, outputs,
92 and outcomes, including the data sources, indicators, and
93 methods to be used.
94 (4) LOGIC MODEL. A visual or narrative representation
95 that shows the logical relationships between a program's
96 resources, activities, outputs, and intended outcomes.
97 (5) MAJOR EXPANSION. An increase in a program's
98 appropriation of 25 percent or more compared to the prior
99 fiscal year, or an expansion that significantly changes the
100 program's target population, service delivery method, or
101 geographic scope.
102 (6) NEW PROGRAM. A program that receives an
103 appropriation for the first time and that is not a
104 continuation or modification of an existing program under a
105 different name or organizational structure.
106 (7) PRELIMINARY STUDY. An evaluation or examination of
107 a proposed or existing policy or program conducted before or
108 during legislative consideration, designed to inform
109 legislative decisions about program design, feasibility, or
110 resource requirements.
111 (8) PRIORITY EVALUATION QUESTION. A significant
112 question about a program's implementation, effectiveness, or
Page 4

question about a program's implementation, effectiveness, or
SB317 Enrolled
113 outcomes that an agency or the commission identifies as
114 warranting systematic evaluation.
115 §29-2B-6
116 The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of Services
117 shall develop and publish on its website the evaluation
118 standards used in the performance of evaluations.
119 §29-2B-7
120 (a) Each year, within 30 days of the conclusion of the
121 regular session of the Legislature, or any special session
122 where an appropriations act is enacted, the Legislative
123 Services Agency shall identify each new program or major
124 expansion of an existing program for which an agency received
125 an appropriation and notify the agency and the Alabama
126 Commission on the Evaluation of Services of the programs
127 subject to the provisions of this chapter.
128 (b) Each agency shall prepare an evaluation plan for
129 each new program and each major expansion of an existing
130 program that is enacted in an appropriations act, as follows:
131 (1) The evaluation plan shall, at a minimum, describe
132 the program's objectives, target population, key activities,
133 expected inputs, outputs, intended outcomes, and benchmarks
134 for intended outcomes. These variables shall be incorporated
135 into a logic model in the plan.
136 (2) The evaluation plan shall identify the indicators
137 the agency will use to track inputs, outputs, and key
138 outcomes; and for each, describe the data sources and explain
139 how the measures will be calculated for each indicator.
140 (3) The evaluation plan shall classify the planned
Page 5

(3) The evaluation plan shall classify the planned
SB317 Enrolled
141 level of evaluation (for example, monitoring, outcome
142 evaluation, or causal impact evaluation) consistent with the
143 typology in the standards issued under Section 29-2B-6.
144 (4) For programs meeting criteria established in
145 guidance under Section 29-2B-6, the evaluation plan shall
146 include a proposal for a causal impact evaluation or a
147 justification for why such an evaluation is not feasible or
148 appropriate.
149 (5) Evaluation plans shall be submitted to the Alabama
150 Commission on the Evaluation of Services for approval and
151 publication on its website, per the standards and guidance
152 issued under Section 29-2B-6, before data is analyzed.
153 §29-2B-8
154 (a) For each program subject to this chapter, the
155 agency shall prepare and submit evaluation reports to the
156 Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of Services on a schedule
157 specified in the standards issued under Section 29-2B-6, which
158 shall include at a minimum:
159 (1) A description of the program as implemented,
160 including any material deviations from the original evaluation
161 plan;
162 (2) Results on the agreed-upon input, output, and
163 outcome indicators, including baseline values and trends over
164 time;
165 (3) For programs with a causal impact evaluation, a
166 summary of the evaluation design, key findings, and
167 limitations; and
168 (4) The agency's interpretation of the findings and
Page 6

(4) The agency's interpretation of the findings and
SB317 Enrolled
169 planned actions in response (for example, continuation,
170 expansion, modification, or termination).
171 (b) The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
172 Services shall publish submitted evaluation reports on its
173 website.
174 §29-2B-9
175 The Legislature, by language in an appropriations act
176 or other act, may require an evaluation of a specific program
177 or line item. Such a provision may:
178 (1) Specify that no more than a stated percentage of
179 funds may be expended until the agency has submitted an
180 evaluation plan meeting the standards of this chapter;
181 (2) Require that an evaluation report be submitted by a
182 certain date and that continuation, renewal, or expansion of
183 funding in a subsequent fiscal year shall consider the
184 findings; or
185 (3) Identify any additional or different indicators or
186 evaluation questions that are particularly important for the
187 program in question.
188 §29-2B-10
189 (a) The Legislature, by request of the Joint
190 Legislative Committee on Finances and Budget or by language in
191 an appropriations act or other act, may direct the Alabama
192 Commission on the Evaluation of Services to conduct a
193 preliminary study of proposed or existing policies or
194 programs.
195 (b) Any action directing a preliminary study shall
196 specify:
Page 7

specify:
SB317 Enrolled
197 (1) The policy or program to be examined; and
198 (2) The questions or issues the study should address.
199 (c) The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
200 Services shall coordinate with the respective agencies or
201 entities impacted by the study to:
202 (1) Confirm the scope and objectives of the study;
203 (2) Establish a timeline for completion based on study
204 complexity and available resources;
205 (3) Identify necessary resources, including estimated
206 costs and staffing needs; and
207 (4) Determine the content and format of the final
208 report.
209 (d) If the Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
210 Services determines that completing a preliminary study as
211 specified would require resources or time periods that exceed
212 available capacity of the commission or agency, the commission
213 may propose to the Legislature modifications to the study
214 scope, timeline, or resource allocation.
215 (e) Preliminary studies may examine:
216 (1) The feasibility of proposed programs or policies;
217 (2) Estimated costs and potential fiscal impacts;
218 (3) Experiences with similar programs in other
219 jurisdictions;
220 (4) Available data and evidence related to the policy
221 area;
222 (5) Evaluation design options if the policy or program
223 is enacted; or
224 (6) Expected implementation challenges and resource
Page 8

(6) Expected implementation challenges and resource
SB317 Enrolled
225 requirements.
226 (f) Each preliminary study report shall include:
227 (1) A description of the policy or program examined;
228 (2) The study methodology and data sources used;
229 (3) Key findings addressing the questions specified in
230 the directing act;
231 (4) Limitations of the analysis; and
232 (5) Implications for policy design or implementation,
233 if applicable.
234 (g) Upon completion, the Alabama Commission on the
235 Evaluation of Services shall publish the preliminary study
236 report on the commission's website and submit the report to
237 the Senate Finance and Taxation Committees, the House Ways and
238 Means Committees, the Legislative Committee on the Evaluation
239 of Services, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
240 §29-2B-11
241 (a) There is hereby created a continuing legislative
242 committee to be known as the Legislative Committee on the
243 Evaluation of Services to exercise general supervision and
244 control over the actions of the Alabama Commission on the
245 Evaluation of Services.
246 (b) The committee shall be led by the Chair of the
247 Senate Finance and Taxation General Fund Committee, the Chair
248 of the House Ways and Means General Fund Committee, the Chair
249 of the Senate Finance and Taxation Education Committee, and
250 the Chair of the House Ways and Means Education Committee who
251 shall alternate as the chair of the committee each year.
252 (c) The Alabama Legislative Committee on the Evaluation
Page 9

(c) The Alabama Legislative Committee on the Evaluation
SB317 Enrolled
253 of Services shall have 12 members. The membership of the
254 committee shall include the following:
255 (1) The Chair and Vice-chair of the Senate Finance and
256 Taxation Education Committee.
257 (2) The Chair and Vice-chair of the Senate Finance and
258 Taxation General Fund Committee.
259 (3) The Chair and Vice-chair of the House Ways and
260 Means Education Committee.
261 (4) The Chair and Vice-chair of the House Ways and
262 Means General Fund Committee.
263 (5) One member of the Senate, appointed by the
264 President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
265 (6) One member of the House of Representatives,
266 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
267 (7) One member of the Senate, appointed by the Minority
268 Leader of the Senate.
269 (8) One member of the House of Representatives,
270 appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of
271 Representatives.
272 (d) The committee shall meet at the call of the chair
273 or any two members, provided that the committee shall meet at
274 least once every six months. A majority of the members of the
275 committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
276 business at meetings. Members of the committee shall be
277 entitled to their regular legislative compensation, per diem,
278 and travel expenses each day they attend a meeting of the
279 commission in accordance with Section 49 of the Constitution
280 of Alabama of 2022. These payments shall be paid out of any
Page 10

of Alabama of 2022. These payments shall be paid out of any
SB317 Enrolled
281 funds appropriated for the use of the Legislature by means of
282 warrants drawn by the Comptroller on the State Treasury.
283 (e) Members of the committee may participate in a
284 meeting of the committee by means of telephone conference,
285 video conference, or similar communications equipment by means
286 of which all persons participating in the meeting may hear
287 each other at the same time. Participation by such means shall
288 constitute presence in person at a meeting for all purposes.
289 Section 2. (a) Chapter 2A of Title 29, Code of Alabama
290 1975, related to the Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
291 Services, is repealed.
292 (b) Any reference in any law to the Alabama Commission
293 on the Evaluation of Services under Chapter 2A of Title 29,
294 Code of Alabama 1975, shall be deemed a reference to the
295 Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of Services created by
296 Section 1.
297 (c) The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
298 Services created by Section 1 shall be deemed a successor to
299 the Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of Services under
300 Chapter 2A of Title 29, Code of Alabama 1975 for all
301 contracts, agreements, and memorandums of understanding.
302 (d) On October 1, 2026, all papers, books, materials,
303 furnishings, funds, personnel, and property of the Alabama
304 Commission on the Evaluation of Services under Chapter 2A of
305 Title 29, Code of Alabama 1975 shall be transferred to the
306 Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of Services created by
307 Section 1.
308 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
Page 11

Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
SB317 Enrolled
309 1, 2026.
Page 12

1, 2026.
SB317 Enrolled
310
311
312
313
314
315
316 ________________________________________________
317 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
318
319
320
321 ________________________________________________
322 Speaker of the House of Representatives
323
324
325 SB317
326 Senate 26-Feb-26
327 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
328 the Senate.
329
330 Patrick Harris,
331 Secretary.
332
333
334
335
336 House of Representatives
337 Amended and passed: 01-Apr-26
338
339
340
341
342 Senate concurred in House amendment 07-Apr-26
343
344
345
346
347 By: Senator Orr
Page 13